Maryland, session 2025, HB1323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–205.5.
(A) (1) THE STATE BOARD SHALL DEVELOP CURRICULUM CONTENT
STANDARDS FOR A UNIT OF INSTRUCTION ON ASIAN AMERICAN HISTORY FOR
PUBLIC SCHOOLS IN THE STATE.
(2) THE ASIAN AMERICAN HISTORY CURRICULUM CONTENT
STANDARDS SHALL:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1323*

HOUSE BILL 1323
(I) ENABLE STUDENTS TO RESPECT THE DIGNITY OF ALL
RACES AND ALL PEOPLE; AND
(II) REQUIRE AGE–APPROPRIATE INSTRUCTION ON THE
FOLLOWING TOPICS:
1. THE EVENTS OF ASIAN AMERICAN HISTORY;
2. ASIAN AMERICAN HISTORY IN MARYLAND AND THE
MID–ATLANTIC REGION; AND
3. CONTRIBUTIONS MADE BY ASIAN AMERICANS,
INCLUDING THEIR:
A. ROLES IN THE ADVANCEMENT OF CIVIL RIGHTS FROM
THE 19TH CENTURY ONWARD;
B. ACCOMPLISHMENTS IN GOVERNMENT, THE ARTS,
HUMANITIES, AND SCIENCE; AND
C. CONTRIBUTIONS AS A COMMUNITY TO THE
ECONOMIC, CULTURAL, SOCIAL, AND POLITICAL DEVELOPMENT OF THE UNITED
STATES.
(3) THE STATE BOARD MAY PREPARE AND MAKE AVAILABLE
INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS, INCLUDING THE PUBLIC BROADCASTING SERVICE’S
INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS ON ASIAN AMERICANS, THAT MAY BE USED AS A GUIDE
FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF ASIAN AMERICAN HISTORY CURRICULUM CONTENT
STANDARDS.
(B) (1) BEGINNING IN THE 2026–2027 SCHOOL YEAR, EACH COUNTY
BOARD SHALL IMPLEMENT THE ASIAN AMERICAN HISTORY CURRICULUM CONTENT
STANDARDS DEVELOPED BY THE STATE BOARD UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION IN EACH PUBLIC SCHOOL IN THE COUNTY.
(2) (I) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL DETERMINE THE
APPROPRIATE AMOUNT OF INSTRUCTIONAL TIME NECESSARY TO SATISFY THE
REQUIREMENT FOR A UNIT OF INSTRUCTION ON ASIAN AMERICAN HISTORY.
(II) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL ENSURE THAT A UNIT OF
INSTRUCTION ON ASIAN AMERICAN HISTORY IS:
1. TAUGHT AT LEAST ONCE DURING ELEMENTARY

HOUSE BILL 1323 3
SCHOOL;
2. INCLUDED AT LEAST ONCE IN A REQUIRED HISTORY
COURSE IN MIDDLE SCHOOL; AND
3. INCLUDED AT LEAST ONCE IN A HISTORY COURSE
REQUIRED TO GRADUATE FROM HIGH SCHOOL.
(3) A COUNTY BOARD MAY DEVELOP AN ONLINE COURSE TO SATISFY
THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(C) EACH COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT SHALL ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH
THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(D) THE STATE BOARD MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.